Idaho statutes. Title 70 WATERCOURSES AND PORT DISTRICTS
Chapter 20
PORT DISTRICTS — MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec.

§ 70-2001. Liberal construction.

The rules of strict construction shall have no application to the provisions of this act concerning port districts, but the same shall be liberally construed in all respects in order to fully and effectively carry out the purposes and objects for which port districts are authorized.

§ 70-2002. Actions under previous laws ratified.

The acts and proceedings of all port districts under the laws in effect prior to the effective date of this act are hereby ratified and approved, and shall remain in full force and effect until the further action of such port district.

§ 70-2003. Port-owned property not subject to taxation.

All property acquired by port districts for any purpose shall forthwith, upon such acquisition, be removed by the county assessor from the tax rolls of the county, and shall not be subject to taxation by any municipal corporation, political subdivision or instrumentality of this state.

§ 70-2004. Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Port District Law.”